Illinois, session 104th, HB3032.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Sections 1.02 and 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/1.02)  (from Ch. 102, par. 41.02)7    Sec. 1.02. For the purposes of this Act: 8    "Advisory body" includes any public body that supports and 9advises a decision-making body on the implementation of 10policies but does not make decisions to implement legislation 11or policy over any part of the State. 12    "Decision-making body" includes any public body that makes 13decisions to implement legislation or policy over any part of 14this State. 15    "Meeting" means any gathering, whether in person or by 16video or audio conference, telephone call, electronic means 17(such as, without limitation, electronic mail, electronic 18chat, and instant messaging), or other means of 19contemporaneous interactive communication, of a majority of a 20quorum of the members of a public body held for the purpose of 21discussing public business or, for a 5-member public body, a 22quorum of the members of a public body held for the purpose of 23discussing public business.  HB3032- 2 -LRB104 05558 BDA 15588 b1    Accordingly, for a 5-member public body, 3 members of the 2body constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of 3 members 3is necessary to adopt any motion, resolution, or ordinance, 4unless a greater number is otherwise required. 5    "Public body" includes all legislative, executive, 6administrative or advisory bodies of the State, counties, 7townships, cities, villages, incorporated towns, school 8districts and all other municipal corporations, boards, 9bureaus, committees or commissions of this State, and any 10subsidiary bodies of any of the foregoing including but not 11limited to committees and subcommittees which are supported in 12whole or in part by tax revenue, or which expend tax revenue, 13except the General Assembly and committees or commissions 14thereof. "Public body" includes tourism boards and convention 15or civic center boards located in counties that are contiguous 16to the Mississippi River with populations of more than 250,000 17but less than 300,000. "Public body" includes the Health 18Facilities and Services Review Board. "Public body" does not 19include a child death review team or the Illinois Child Death 20Review Teams Executive Council established under the Child 21Death Review Team Act, an ethics commission acting under the 22State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, a regional youth 23advisory board or the Statewide Youth Advisory Board 24established under the Department of Children and Family 25Services Statewide Youth Advisory Board Act, the Illinois 26Independent Tax Tribunal, or the regional interagency fatality   HB3032- 3 -LRB104 05558 BDA 15588 b1review teams and the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 2Council established under the Adult Protective Services Act. 3(Source: P.A. 103-626, eff. 1-1-25.) 4    (5 ILCS 120/7)5    Sec. 7. Attendance by a means other than physical 6presence.7    (a) If a quorum of the members of the public body is 8physically present as required by Section 2.01, a majority of 9the public body may allow a member of that body to attend the 10meeting by other means if the member is prevented from 11physically attending because of: (i) personal illness or 12disability; (ii) employment purposes or the business of the 13public body; (iii) a family or other emergency; or (iv) 14unexpected childcare obligations. "Other means" is by video or 15audio conference.16    (b) If a member wishes to attend a meeting by other means, 17the member must notify the recording secretary or clerk of the 18public body before the meeting unless advance notice is 19impractical.20    (c) A majority of the public body may allow a member to 21attend a meeting by other means only in accordance with and to 22the extent allowed by rules adopted by the public body. The 23rules must conform to the requirements and restrictions of 24this Section, may further limit the extent to which attendance 25by other means is allowed, and may provide for the giving of   HB3032- 4 -LRB104 05558 BDA 15588 b1additional notice to the public or further facilitate public 2access to meetings. 3    (d) The limitations of this Section shall not apply to (i) 4closed meetings of (A) public bodies with statewide 5jurisdiction, (B) Illinois library systems with jurisdiction 6over a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square 7miles, (C) municipal transit districts with jurisdiction over 8a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles, or 9(D) local workforce innovation areas with jurisdiction over a 10specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles or 11(ii) open or closed meetings of State advisory boards or 12bodies that do not have authority to make binding 13recommendations or determinations or to take any other 14substantive action. State advisory boards or bodies, public 15bodies with statewide jurisdiction, Illinois library systems 16with jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 174,500 square miles, municipal transit districts with 18jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 194,500 square miles, and local workforce investment areas with 20jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 214,500 square miles, however, may permit members to attend 22meetings by other means only in accordance with and to the 23extent allowed by specific procedural rules adopted by the 24body. For the purposes of this Section, "local workforce 25innovation area" means any local workforce innovation area or 26areas designated by the Governor pursuant to the federal   HB3032- 5 -LRB104 05558 BDA 15588 b1Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or its reauthorizing 2legislation. 3    (e) Subject to the requirements of Section 2.06 but 4notwithstanding any other provision of law, an open or closed 5meeting subject to this Act may be conducted by audio or video 6conference, without the physical presence of a quorum of the 7members, so long as the following conditions are met:8        (1) the Governor or the Director of the Illinois 9    Department of Public Health has issued a disaster 10    declaration related to public health concerns because of a 11    disaster as defined in Section 4 of the Illinois Emergency 12    Management Agency Act, and all or part of the jurisdiction 13    of the public body is covered by the disaster area;14        (2) the head of the public body as defined in 15    subsection (e) of Section 2 of the Freedom of Information 16    Act determines that an in-person meeting or a meeting 17    conducted under this Act is not practical or prudent 18    because of a disaster;19        (3) all members of the body participating in the 20    meeting, wherever their physical location, shall be 21    verified and can hear one another and can hear all 22    discussion and testimony;23        (4) for open meetings, members of the public present 24    at the regular meeting location of the body can hear all 25    discussion and testimony and all votes of the members of 26    the body, unless attendance at the regular meeting   HB3032- 6 -LRB104 05558 BDA 15588 b1    location is not feasible due to the disaster, including 2    the issued disaster declaration, in which case the public 3    body must make alternative arrangements and provide notice 4    pursuant to this Section of such alternative arrangements 5    in a manner to allow any interested member of the public 6    access to contemporaneously hear all discussion, 7    testimony, and roll call votes, such as by offering a 8    telephone number or a web-based link;9        (5) at least one member of the body, chief legal 10    counsel, or chief administrative officer is physically 11    present at the regular meeting location, unless unfeasible 12    due to the disaster, including the issued disaster 13    declaration; and14        (6) all votes are conducted by roll call, and so each 15    member's vote on each issue can be identified and 16    recorded; .17        (7) except Except in the event of a bona fide 18    emergency, 48 hours' notice shall be given of a meeting to 19    be held pursuant to this Section; . notice Notice shall be 20    given to all members of the public body, shall be posted on 21    the website of the public body, and shall also be provided 22    to any news media who has requested notice of meetings 23    pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act; . 24    if If the public body declares a bona fide emergency:25            (A) notice Notice shall be given pursuant to 26        subsection (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act, and the   HB3032- 7 -LRB104 05558 BDA 15588 b1        presiding officer shall state the nature of the 2        emergency at the beginning of the meeting; and .3            (B) the The public body must comply with the 4        verbatim recording requirements set forth in Section 5        2.06 of this Act; .6        (8) each Each member of the body participating in a 7    meeting by audio or video conference for a meeting held 8    pursuant to this Section is considered present at the 9    meeting for purposes of determining a quorum and 10    participating in all proceedings; .11        (9) in In addition to the requirements for open 12    meetings under Section 2.06, public bodies holding open 13    meetings under this subsection (e) must also keep a 14    verbatim record of all their meetings in the form of an 15    audio or video recording; . verbatim Verbatim records made 16    under this paragraph (9) shall be made available to the 17    public under, and are otherwise subject to, the provisions 18    of Section 2.06; and .19        (10) the The public body shall bear all costs 20    associated with compliance with this subsection (e).21    (f) Subject to the requirements of Section 2.06 but 22notwithstanding any other provision of law, an open or closed 23meeting subject to this Act of an advisory body may be 24conducted by audio or video conference, without the physical 25presence of a quorum of the members, so long as the following 26conditions are met:  HB3032- 8 -LRB104 05558 BDA 15588 b1        (1) the members of the advisory body decide in a 2    majority vote to conduct the meeting by audio or video 3    conference in accordance with and to the extent allowed by 4    rules adopted by the advisory body;5        (2) the advisory body provides for the giving of 6    additional notice to the public or further facilitates 7    public access to meetings;8        (3) all members of the advisory body participating in 9    the meeting, wherever their physical location, shall be 10    verified and can hear one another and can hear all 11    discussion and testimony;12        (4) for open meetings, members of the public present 13    at the regular meeting location of the advisory body can 14    hear all discussion and testimony and all votes of the 15    members of the body, unless attendance at the regular 16    meeting location is not feasible, in which case the public 17    body must make alternative arrangements and provide notice 18    pursuant to this Section of the alternative arrangements 19    in a manner to allow any interested member of the public 20    access to contemporaneously hear all discussion, 21    testimony, and roll call votes, such as by offering a 22    telephone number or a web-based link;23        (5) at least one member of the advisory body, chief 24    legal counsel, or chief administrative officer is 25    physically present at the regular meeting location, unless 26    unfeasible;  HB3032- 9 -LRB104 05558 BDA 15588 b1        (6) all votes are conducted by roll call, and each 2    member's vote on each issue can be identified and 3    recorded;4        (7) 48 hours' notice shall be given of a meeting to be 5    held pursuant to this Section; notice shall be given to 6    all members of the public body, shall be posted on the 7    website of the public body, and shall also be provided to 8    any news media who has requested notice of meetings 9    pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act; 10    the public body must comply with the verbatim recording 11    requirements set forth in Section 2.06 of this Act;12        (8) each member of the advisory body participating in 13    a meeting by audio or video conference for a meeting held 14    pursuant to this Section is considered present at the 15    meeting for purposes of determining a quorum and 16    participating in all proceedings;17        (9) in addition to the requirements for open meetings 18    under Section 2.06, advisory bodies holding open meetings 19    under this subsection (f) must also keep a verbatim record 20    of all of their meetings in the form of an audio or video 21    recording; verbatim records made under this paragraph (9) 22    shall be made available to the public under, and are 23    otherwise subject to, the provisions of Section 2.06; and24        (10) the advisory body shall bear all costs associated 25    with compliance with this subsection (f).26(Source: P.A. 103-311, eff. 7-28-23.)